District of Columbia statutes.
1-325.31

Fiscal Year 2006 Educational Investments Fund for District of Columbia Public Schools and Public Charter Schools.

There is established a Fiscal Year 2006 Educational Investments Fund for District of Columbia Public Schools and Public Charter Schools (“Fund”), into which shall be deposited $25.2 million in Fiscal Year 2006, of which $21 million and $4.2 million shall be allocated in Fiscal Year 2006 to the District of Columbia Public Schools and public charter schools, respectively, to conduct activities leading to increased student achievement and improved school performance, including comprehensive reading and math programs, parent and family resource centers, comprehensive art and music programs, the Summer Bridge Program, and a textbook management system. No funds from the Fund shall be made available for expenditure unless, by no later December 31, 2005, the Superintendent, the District of Columbia Public Charter School Board, and the District of Columbia Board of Education Charter School Board submit to the Mayor detailed plans which describe specific initiatives or activities that will be implemented during Fiscal Year 2006, and include budget and performance goals and measures for each identified initiative or activity.

History

Oct. 20, 2005, D.C. Law 16-33, § 4032, 52 DCR 7503

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 4032 of Fiscal Year 2006 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2005 (D.C. Act 16-168, July 26, 2005, 52 DCR 7667).

Short Title

Short title of subtitle D of title IV of Law 16-33: Section 4031 of D.C. Law 16-33 provided that subtitle D of title IV of the act may be cited as the Fiscal Year 2006 Educational Investments Fund for District of Columbia Public Schools and Public Charter Schools Establishment Act of 2005.